Utah statutes.
36-12-4.   Interim committees of two houses -- Meeting jointly -- Joint rules -- Majority vote.

Corresponding interim committees of the two houses may meet jointly to consider the same or similar studies or to recommend joint legislative programs.  In any joint meeting, the rules of the Legislature apply.  A majority vote of corresponding interim committees of the two houses meeting jointly includes at least 50% of the members in one house and more than 50% of the members in the other house.

